idioms/vallader-override.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Frequent words with different forms in Vallader
! Author: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013


Multichar_Symbols +Art +Def +Indef ^= ^| +Prep
+Pron +Pers +Refl +Poss +Dem +Interrog
^DB +Noun +Nom +AccDat +Acc
+Masc +Fem +MF +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl
+Apo +Ton +Aton +Conj +Subj +Verb +PresInd
@U.FLEX.MSg@ @U.FLEX.FSg@ @U.FLEX.MPl@ @U.FLEX.FPl@

LEXICON Root
INDEFINITEA ;
DEFINITEWITHPREP ;
PERSONAL ;
REFLEXIVE ;
POSSESSIVE ;
DEMONSTRATIVE ;
INTERROGATIVE ;
INDEFINITEP ;
OTHERFORMS ;

! articles
LEXICON INDEFINITEA
in+Art+Indef+Masc+Sg:ün	#;
in+Art+Indef+Fem+Sg:üna	#;
in+Art+Indef+Fem+Sg+Apo:ün'	#;

LEXICON DEFINITEWITHPREP
! a, da as in Rumantsch Grischun

pro+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:prol	#;
pro+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:prols	#;

en+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:i'l	#;
en+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:i'ls	#;
en+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:illa	#;
en+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:illas	#;

per+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:pel	#;
per+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:pels	#;
per+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:pella	#;
per+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:pellas	#;

cun+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:cul	#;
cun+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:culs	#;
cun+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:culla	#;
cun+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:cullas	#;

sin+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:sül	#;
sin+Prep^=+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:süls	#;
sin+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:sülla	#;
sin+Prep^=+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:süllas	#;



! pronouns
LEXICON PERSONAL
! jau
jau+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:eu	#;
jau+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+1P+MF+Sg:am	#;
! ti
ti+Pron+Pers+Nom+2P+MF+Sg:tü	#;
ti+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Sg:at	#;
! el, ella
el+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+3P+Masc+Sg:til	#;
ella+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+3P+Fem+Sg:tilla	#;
ella+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+3P+Fem+Sg+Apo:till'	#;
! vus
els+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:s'	#;
! els, ellas
els+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+3P+Masc+Pl:als	#;
ellas+Pron+Pers+AccDat+Aton+3P+Fem+Pl:las	#;



LEXICON REFLEXIVE
! jau
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+1P+MF+Sg:am	#;
! ti
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Sg:at	#;
! el, ella
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+3P+MF+Sg:as	#;
! vus
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:as	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+2P+MF+Pl+Apo:s'	#;
! els, ellas
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+3P+MF+Pl:as	#;
sai+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+3P+MF+Pl+Apo:s'	#;



LEXICON POSSESSIVE
! jau
mes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:meis	#;
mes+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Sg:meis	#;
mes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Pl:meis	#;
mes+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Pl:meis	#;
! ti
tes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:teis	#;
mes+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Sg:meis	#;
tes+Pron+Poss+Masc+Pl:teis	#;
tes+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Pl:teis	#;
! el, ella
ses+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:seis	#;
mes+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Sg:meis	#;
ses+Pron+Poss+Masc+Pl:seis	#;
ses+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Pl:seis	#;
! nus
noss+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:nos	#;
noss+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Sg:nos	#;
! vus
voss+Pron+Poss+Masc+Sg:vos	#;
voss+Pron+Poss^DB+Noun+Masc+Sg:vos	#;



LEXICON DEMONSTRATIVE
in+Pron+Dem:ün			REGULARSINGULAR;
quest+Pron+Dem:quist	REGULAR;



LEXICON INTERROGATIVE
tge+Pron+Interrog:che		#;
tgenin+Pron+Interrog:chenün	REGULAR;
tgi+Pron+Interrog:chi		#;



LEXICON INDEFINITEP
in+Pron+Indef:ün			REGULARSINGULAR;
ins+Pron+Indef:i's			#;
intgins+Pron+Indef:inchün	REGULARPLURAL;
mintgin+Pron+Indef:minchün	REGULARSINGULAR;
!!
! tut
tut+Pron+Indef+Masc+Sg:tuot		#;
tut+Pron+Indef+Masc+Pl:tuots	#;
tut+Pron+Indef+Fem+Sg:tuotta	#;
tut+Pron+Indef+Fem+Pl:tuottas	#;



!! Endings:
LEXICON REGULAR
+Masc+Sg:0	#;
+Masc+Pl:s	#;
+Fem+Sg:a	#;
+Fem+Pl:as	#;

LEXICON REGULARSINGULAR
+Masc+Sg:0	#;
+Fem+Sg:a	#;

LEXICON REGULARPLURAL
+Masc+Pl:s	#;
+Fem+Pl:as	#;

LEXICON OTHERFORMS
! verbs
esser+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg:es	#;

! prepositions
en+Prep:in	#;
da+Prep^|+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+MF+Sg:da's	#;
da+Prep^|+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+MF+Pl:da's	#;

! con- and subjunctions
tge+Subj:chi	#;
tge+Subj+Apo:chi'd	#;
tge+Subj:cha	#;
tge+Subj+Apo:cha'd	#;
tge+Subj+Apo:ch'	#;

tge+Subj^|+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+MF+Sg:che's	#;
tge+Subj^|+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+MF+Pl:che's	#;
tge+Subj^|+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+MF+Sg:cha's	#;
tge+Subj^|+Pron+Refl+AccDat+Aton+MF+Sg:cha's	#;

tge+Subj^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Sg:cha'l	#;
tge+Subj^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Pl:cha'ls	#;
sco+Conj^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Sg:scu'l	#;
sco+Conj^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Pl:scu'ls	#;
ma+Conj^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Sg:ma'l	#;
ma+Conj^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Pl:ma'ls	#;
e+Conj^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Sg:e'l	#;
e+Conj^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Pl:e'ls	#;
